Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-634
Violation; penalty.

(1) It is unlawful for a person to operate without a valid license or operate while a license is revoked or suspended if a license is required by the Commercial Dog and Cat Operator Inspection Act. A licensee shall not operate in any manner which is not in conformity with the act or the rules and regulations adopted and promulgated pursuant thereto or interfere with the duties of the department or any final order of the director pursuant to the act.

(2) Any person who violates any provision of the act is guilty of a Class I misdemeanor.

Laws 2000, LB 825, § 10.